Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-314
Deviation from route; special or charter parties.

A common carrier by motor vehicle operating under any certificate issued under section 75-311 may occasionally deviate from the route over which or the fixed termini between which it is authorized to operate under the certificate under such general or special rules and regulations as the commission may prescribe. Any common carrier by motor vehicle who transports passengers under its certificate may operate in intrastate commerce to any place carrying special or charter parties under such rules and regulations as prescribed by the commission.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. III, § 14, p. 1382;

Laws 1995, LB 424, § 39.